Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 10. GENERAL GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE B. INFORMATION AND PLANNING

CHAPTER 2056. STRATEGIC PLANS OF OPERATION

Sec. 2056.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "state agency" means a department, board, commission, or other entity of state government, other than a university system or an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code, that:

(1) has authority that is not limited to a geographical portion of the state;

(2) was created by the constitution or a state statute with an ongoing mission and responsibilities;

(3) is not the office of the governor or lieutenant governor;

(4) is not within the judicial or legislative branch of government; and

(5) is not a committee created under state law whose primary function is to advise an agency.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.29(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 118, Sec. 5.01, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 2056.002. STRATEGIC PLANS. (a) A state agency shall make a strategic plan for its operations. Each even-numbered year, the agency shall issue a plan covering five fiscal years beginning with the next odd-numbered fiscal year.

(b) The Legislative Budget Board and the governor's office shall determine the elements required to be included in each agency's strategic plan. Unless modified by the Legislative Budget Board and the governor's office, and except as provided by Subsection (c), a plan must include:

(1) a statement of the mission and goals of the state agency;

(2) a description of the indicators developed under this chapter and used to measure the output and outcome of the agency;

(3) identification of the groups of people served by the agency, including those having service priorities, or other service measures established by law, and estimates of changes in those groups expected during the term of the plan;

(4) an analysis of the use of the agency's resources to meet the agency's needs, including future needs, and an estimate of additional resources that may be necessary to meet future needs;

(5) an analysis of expected changes in the services provided by the agency because of changes in state or federal law;

(6) a description of the means and strategies for meeting the agency's needs, including future needs, and achieving the goals established under Section 2056.006 for each area of state government for which the agency provides services;

(7) a description of the capital improvement needs of the agency during the term of the plan and a statement, if appropriate, of the priority of those needs;

(8) identification of each geographic region of this state, including the Texas-Louisiana border region and the Texas-Mexico border region, served by the agency, and if appropriate the agency's means and strategies for serving each region;

(9) a description of the training of the agency's contract managers under Section 656.052;

(10) an analysis of the agency's expected expenditures that relate to federally owned or operated military installations or facilities, or communities where a federally owned or operated military installation or facility is located;

(11) an analysis of the strategic use of information resources as provided by the instructions prepared under Section 2054.095;

(12) a written certification of the agency's compliance with the cybersecurity training required under Sections 2054.5191 and 2054.5192; and

(13) other information that may be required.

(c) A state agency's plan that does not include an item described by Subsection (b) must include the reason the item does not apply to the agency.

(d) A state agency shall send two copies of each plan to both the Legislative Reference Library and the state publications clearinghouse of the Texas State Library and one copy each to:

(1) the governor;

(2) the lieutenant governor;

(3) the speaker of the house of representatives;

(4) the Legislative Budget Board; and

(5) the state auditor.

(e) In this section:

(1) "Capital improvement" means any building or infrastructure project that will be owned by the state and built with direct appropriations or with the proceeds of state-issued bonds or paid from revenue sources other than general revenue.

(2) "Texas-Louisiana border region" means the area consisting of the counties of Bowie, Camp, Cass, Delta, Franklin, Gregg, Harrison, Hopkins, Lamar, Marion, Morris, Panola, Red River, Rusk, Smith, Titus, Upshur, and Wood.

(3) "Texas-Mexico border region" means the area consisting of the counties of Atascosa, Bandera, Bexar, Brewster, Brooks, Cameron, Crockett, Culberson, Dimmit, Duval, Edwards, El Paso, Frio, Hidalgo, Hudspeth, Jeff Davis, Jim Hogg, Jim Wells, Kenedy, Kerr, Kimble, Kinney, Kleberg, La Salle, Live Oak, Maverick, McMullen, Medina, Nueces, Pecos, Presidio, Real, Reeves, San Patricio, Starr, Sutton, Terrell, Uvalde, Val Verde, Webb, Willacy, Zapata, and Zavala.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.29(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 188, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1422, Sec. 5.02, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 6, eff. May 27, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 691 (H.B. 1788), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1203 (S.B. 1455), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 526 (S.B. 255), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 573 (S.B. 241), Sec. 1.17, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 51 (H.B. 1118), Sec. 4, eff. May 18, 2021.

Sec. 2056.0021. WORKFORCE PLANNING. As part of the strategic plan required under Section 2056.002, a state agency shall conduct a strategic staffing analysis and develop a workforce plan, according to guidelines developed by the state auditor, to address critical staffing and training needs of the agency, including the need for experienced employees to impart knowledge to their potential successors.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 715, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 2056.0022. IMMUNIZATIONS AWARENESS. (a) Each state agency that has contact with families in this state either in person or by telephone, mail, or the Internet shall include in the agency's strategic plan a strategy for increasing public awareness of the need for early childhood immunizations.

(b) The Texas Department of Health shall identify the state agencies to which this section applies and notify the agencies of their duty under this section.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 844, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 2056.003. FORMS AND INSTRUCTIONS. The Governor's Office of Budget and Planning and the Legislative Budget Board shall develop forms and instructions for a state agency to use in preparing the agency's strategic plan.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 2056.004. ASSISTANCE FOR AGENCIES. The Governor's Office of Budget and Planning and the Legislative Budget Board shall work with each state agency to determine acceptable measures of output, outcome, unit cost, and cost-effectiveness for use in the agency's plan.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.29(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 2056.005. INFORMATION PROVIDED TO AGENCIES. (a) Not later than March 1 of each even-numbered year, the comptroller shall provide a long-term forecast of the state's economy and population to each state agency for use in the agency's strategic planning.

(b) The comptroller, the Governor's Office of Budget and Planning, and the Legislative Budget Board jointly shall determine the information to be included in the forecast.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.29(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 2056.006. GOALS. (a) The governor, in cooperation with the Legislative Budget Board, shall establish and adopt achievement goals for each functional area of state government. Unless modified by the Governor's Office of Budget and Planning and the Legislative Budget Board, the functional areas must include:

(1) education;

(2) regulation;

(3) natural resources;

(4) health;

(5) human services;

(6) transportation;

(7) public safety and corrections;

(8) general government; and

(9) state employee benefits.

(b) The governor shall provide to each state agency a statement of the goals for each area in which the agency provides services.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.29(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 2056.0065. GOALS: EMPHASIS ON ENHANCING MILITARY FACILITIES. (a) In establishing the goals of a state agency, the agency shall consider the enhancement of military value to federally owned or operated military installations or facilities. The state agency is encouraged to make this evaluation using the most current criteria provided by the Texas Military Preparedness Commission.

(b) If the state agency determines that an expenditure will enhance the military value of a federally owned or operated military installation or facility based on the base realignment and closure criteria, the state agency shall make that expenditure a high priority.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 7, eff. May 27, 2003.

Sec. 2056.007. ADDITIONAL INFORMATION. After a state agency issues its strategic plan, the Governor's Office of Budget and Planning and the Legislative Budget Board may request additional information relating to the plan from the agency. The agency shall provide the information in a timely manner.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 2056.008. HEARING. The Governor's Office of Budget and Planning and the Legislative Budget Board jointly may hold a hearing on any matter required by this chapter.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 2056.009. STATE PLAN. (a) The Governor's Office of Budget and Planning and the Legislative Budget Board jointly may compile a long-range strategic plan for state government using the state agency plans issued under Section 2056.002 and information obtained under Section 2056.007.

(b) The state plan shall be sent to the governor, lieutenant governor, and each member of the legislature not later than the seventh working day of each regular session of the legislature.

(c) The state plan serves as the strategic plan for the governor.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.29(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1203 (S.B. 1455), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 2056.010. AGENCY CONFORMANCE TO STRATEGIC PLAN. The comptroller, the Sunset Advisory Commission, the state auditor, the Legislative Budget Board, or another agency that conducts performance audits of a state agency shall consider in the evaluation of an agency the extent to which the agency conforms to the agency's strategic plan.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.